California statutes. Business and Professions Code
This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 586, Sec. 2.   (AB 3251)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5016.

A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business at any meeting of the board. Notice of each meeting of the board shall be given in accordance with the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The board shall meet at the call of the president and executive officer, but not less than twice each year. Any two members of the board may request the executive officer to call a special meeting, and the executive officer, upon receiving that notice, shall call a meeting pursuant to the procedure prescribed herein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 307, Sec. 64.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

5017.

All meetings of the board shall be open and public, except that the board may hold executive sessions to deliberate on the decision to be reached upon the evidence introduced in a proceeding conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2, of the Government Code.

The members of the board may hold executive sessions to prepare, approve, grade, or administer examinations and shall have jurisdiction or vote over these functions of preparing, approving, grading, or administering examinations in executive session as provided for in Section 11126 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1226, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5017.1.

The board shall post, within 10 days of board approval, the finalized minutes from meetings of the board that are open and public pursuant to Section 5017 on the board’s internet website. The minutes shall remain on the board’s internet website for at least three years. Providing a link on the internet website to the minutes shall satisfy this requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 61.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5017.5.

(a) The board shall provide a live audio or video broadcast, on its internet website, of each of its board meetings that are open and public.

(b) (1) If technical failure prevents the board from providing a live broadcast as specified in subdivision (a), that failure shall not constitute a violation of this section if the board exercised reasonable diligence in providing a live broadcast.

(2) Failure to provide a live broadcast of its board meetings due to technical failure shall not prohibit the board from meeting and taking actions.

(c) The recording of the live audio or video broadcast shall remain on the
 internet website for at least three years. Providing a link on the internet website to the recording of the live audio or video broadcast shall satisfy this requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 62.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5018.

The board may by regulation, prescribe, amend, or repeal rules of professional conduct appropriate to the establishment and maintenance of a high standard of integrity and dignity in the profession. In addition to the requirements contained in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, a copy of the rules shall be provided to every holder of a license under this chapter at least 30 days prior to a date named for a public hearing held for the purpose of receiving and considering objections to any of the proposed provisions. Every licensee of the California Board of Accountancy in this state shall be governed and controlled by the rules and standards adopted by the
 board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 586, Sec. 3.   (AB 3251)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5019.

Every applicant, when subscribing to an application for certificate or registration, shall acknowledge the fact that the applicant has read and understands the rules of professional conduct adopted by the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 2.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5020.

The board may, for the purpose of obtaining technical expertise, appoint an enforcement advisory committee of not more than 13 licensees to provide advice and assistance related to the functions specified in Section 5103. The committee shall act only in an advisory capacity, shall have no authority to initiate any disciplinary action against a licensee, and shall only be authorized to report its findings from any investigation or hearing conducted pursuant to this section to the board, or upon direction of the board, to the executive officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 415, Sec. 1.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5021.

The members of the enforcement advisory and qualifications committees shall hold office for two years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 415, Sec. 2.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5022.

The qualifications committee shall make recommendations and forward its report to the board for action on any matter on which it is authorized to act. An applicant for registration as a certified public accountant who is aggrieved by any action taken by the committee with respect to their qualifications may appeal to the board in accordance with rules or regulations prescribed by the board. The board on the appeal may give an oral or written examination as an aid in determining whether the applicant is qualified under the terms of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 63.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5023.

The board may establish a qualifications committee of its own certified public accountant members or other certified public accountants of the state in good standing, to perform the following advisory duties:

(a) To examine the qualifications of all applicants for the license of certified public accountant.

(b) To recommend to the board applicants for the certified public accountant license who fulfill the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 307, Sec. 67.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

5024.

The board may create and appoint advisory committees, consisting solely of board members or consisting of board members and other persons who are not board members, for the purpose of making recommendations on matters as may be specified by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 415, Sec. 3.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5025.1.

(a) The board may contract with and employ certified public accountants and public accountants as consultants and experts to assist in the investigation and prosecution of judicial and administrative matters.

(b) Contracts made pursuant to this section are not subject to Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except that the board shall apply the standards set forth in Section 19130 in awarding personal service contracts under this section.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may contract with these consultants and experts on a sole source basis.

(d) If a person, not a regular employee of the board, is hired or under contract to provide expertise to the board in the evaluation of the conduct of a licensee, and that person is named as a defendant in a civil action for defamation, tortious interference with prospective business advantage, or other civil causes of action directly resulting from opinions rendered, statements made, or testimony given to the board, its committees, staff, legal counsel, or other representatives, or in any proceeding instituted by the board or to which the board is a party, the board shall provide for representation required to defend that person in that civil action and shall indemnify that person for any judgment rendered against him or her. This right of defense and indemnification shall be the same as, and no greater than, the right provided to a public employee pursuant to Section 825 of the Government Code. Nothing herein shall be construed as expanding or limiting any immunity from liability otherwise provided by law.

(e) On or before June 1 of each year, the board shall report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature the terms of the contract or contracts entered into each fiscal year pursuant to this section. The report shall include the cost, services, terms and duration provided under each contract, the identity of the firms or individuals awarded any contract, and data demonstrating the cost effectiveness of the board’s sole-source contracting in the investigation and prosecution of the board’s enforcement programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 44, Sec. 1.   Effective April 19, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5025.2.

(a) The Legislature finds that there are occasions when the California Board of Accountancy urgently requires additional expenditure authority in order to fund unanticipated enforcement and litigation activities. Without sufficient expenditure authority to obtain the necessary additional resources for urgent litigation and enforcement matters, the board is unable to adequately protect the public. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature that, apart from, and in addition to, the expenditure authority that may otherwise be established, the California Board of Accountancy shall be given the increase in its expenditure authority in any given current fiscal year that is authorized by the Department of Finance pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (b) of this section, for costs and services in urgent litigation and enforcement matters, including, but not limited to, costs for professional and consulting services and for the services of the Attorney General and the Office of Administrative Hearings.

(b) Notwithstanding Control Section 27.00 of the annual Budget Act, Section 11006 of the Government Code, and the amount listed in the annual Budget Act for expenditure, the Department of Finance shall authorize up to two million dollars ($2,000,000) in additional expenditures for the California Board of Accountancy upon a showing by the board that those funds are necessary for public protection and that the shortfall was not anticipated. These additional expenditures shall be payable from the Accountancy Fund for purposes of the board’s litigation or enforcement activities in any given current fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 921, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5025.3.

(a) Whenever the board enters into a contract for litigation or enforcement purposes, including, but not limited to, contracts pursuant to Section 5025.1, funds may be encumbered in the fiscal year the contract is executed and expended at any time during the subsequent 24 months commencing with the last day of the fiscal year in which the contract is executed.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, funds encumbered for a contract pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section are continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal year, however, the appropriation is limited to the period for which funds are authorized to be encumbered under subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 921, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Continuing Education [5026. - 5028.]

5026.

The Legislature has determined it is in the public interest to require that certified public accountants and public accountants licensed under provisions of this chapter comply with continuing education requirements adopted by the board as a prerequisite to the renewal of public accountancy licenses on and after December 31, 1974.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 716.)
-------------------------------------------

5027.

The board shall by regulation prescribe, amend, or repeal rules including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) A definition of basic requirements for continuing education.

(b) A licensee who plans, directs, or approves any financial or compliance audit report on any governmental agency shall complete a minimum of 24 hours of qualifying continuing education in the area of governmental accounting and auditing or related subjects during the two-year license renewal period.

(c) A licensee who provides audit, review, other attestation services, or issues compiled financial statement reports shall, during the two-year license renewal period, complete a minimum of 24 hours of qualifying continuing education in the area of accounting and auditing related to reporting on financial statements.

(d) A licensee with a valid permit to practice public accountancy shall, within a six-year period, complete a continuing education course on the provisions of this chapter and the rules of professional conduct.

(e) A licensee on inactive status shall complete the continuing education course required by subdivision (d) prior to reentering public practice.

(f) A delineation of qualifying programs for maintaining competency.

(g) A system of control and compliance reporting.

In exercising its power under this section for the interests of consumer protection, the board shall establish standards which will assure reasonable currency of knowledge as a basis for a high standard of practice by licensees. The standards shall be established in a manner to assure that a variety of alternatives are available to licensees to comply with the continuing education requirements for renewal of licenses and taking cognizance of specialized areas of practice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 639, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5028.

The board may, in accordance with the intent of this article, make exceptions from continuing education requirements for licensees not engaged in public practice, or for reasons of health, military service, or other good cause. If the licensee returns to the practice of public accounting, they shall meet continuing education requirements as the board may determine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 64.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Powers and Definitions [5030. - 5040.]

5030.

“Board” means the California Board of Accountancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 657, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5031.

“Committee” means any committee created under the provisions of Article 1 (commencing at Section 5000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

5032.

“State” when not specifically referring to this State, means any state, territory or insular possession of the United States, or the District of Columbia.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

5033.

“Certified public accountant” means any person who has received from the board a certificate of certified public accountant and who holds a valid permit to practice under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

5033.1.

For purposes of this chapter, “license” shall also include “certificate.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1278, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5034.

“Public accountant” means any person who has registered with the board as a public accountant and who holds a valid permit for the practice of public accountancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

5035.

“Person” includes individual, partnership, firm, association, limited liability company, or corporation, unless otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5035.1.

“Firm” means a sole proprietorship, a corporation, or a partnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 303, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5035.2.

“Client”, as used in any context in this chapter, means any person for whom public accountancy services are performed or to whom financial products, financial services, or securities are sold or provided at the licensee’s public accountancy practice or through referral to any other location or business in which the certified public accountant has a material interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 489, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5035.3.

For purposes of Sections 5054 and 5096.12, “firm” includes any entity that is authorized or permitted to practice public accountancy as a firm under the laws of another state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 586, Sec. 4.   (AB 3251)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5035.4.

“Comparable licensure requirements” means another state requires passage of the examination described in Section 5082 and has education and experience requirements, when considered collectively, that meet or exceed the standards established by the board pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 5080).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 293, Sec. 1.   (AB 1175)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5036.

Whenever any statute requires that any reports, financial statements, and other documents for any department, division, board, commission, or agency of this state be prepared by certified public accountants, the requirement shall be construed to mean a licensee or licensees with a valid permit to practice public accountancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 639, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5037.

(a) All statements, records, schedules, working papers and memoranda made by a licensee or a partner, shareholder, officer, director, or employee of a licensee, incident to, or in the course of, rendering services to a client in the practice of public accountancy, except the reports submitted by the licensee to the client and except for records that are part of the client’s records, shall be and remain the property of the licensee in the absence of an express agreement between the licensee and the client to the contrary. No such statement, record, schedule, working paper, or memoranda shall be sold, transferred, or bequeathed, without the consent of the client or their personal representative or assignee, to anyone other than one or more surviving partners or stockholders or new partners or
 stockholders of the licensee, or any combined or merged firm or successor in interest to the licensee.

(b) A licensee shall furnish to their client or former client, upon request and reasonable notice:

(1) A copy of the licensee’s working papers, to the extent that those working papers include records that would ordinarily constitute part of the client’s records and are not otherwise available to the client.

(2) Any accounting or other records belonging to, or obtained from or on behalf of, the client that the licensee removed from the client’s premises or received for the client’s account. The licensee may make and retain copies of documents of the client when they form the basis for work done by them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 66.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5037.1.

Nothing in subdivision (k) of Section 17406 of the Financial Code or subdivision (a) of Section 17406.1 of the Financial Code shall be construed to impair or impede a licensee’s rights, duties, and obligations under Section 5037.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5038.

If any provisions of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the remainder of the chapter and the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5131 by Stats. 1959, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

5040.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is important to inform taxpayers that they may make voluntary contributions to certain funds or programs, as provided on the state income tax return. The Legislature further finds and declares that many taxpayers remain unaware of the voluntary contribution check-offs on the state income tax return. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to encourage all persons who prepare state income tax returns, including accountants, to inform their clients in writing, prior to the completion of any state income tax return, that they may make a contribution to any voluntary contribution check-off on the state income tax return if they so choose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Application of Chapter [5050. - 5058.4.]

5050.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of this section, in subdivision (a) of Section 5054, and in Section 5096.12, no person shall engage in the practice of public accountancy in this state unless the person is the holder of a valid permit to practice public accountancy issued by the board or a holder of a practice privilege pursuant to Article 5.1 (commencing with Section 5096).

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a person who holds a valid and current license, registration, certificate, permit, or other authority to practice public accountancy from a foreign country, and lawfully practicing therein, from temporarily engaging in the practice of
 public accountancy in this state incident to an engagement in that country, provided that:

(1) The temporary practice is regulated by the foreign country and is performed under accounting or auditing standards of that country.

(2) The person does not hold themselves out as being the holder of a valid California permit to practice public accountancy or the holder of a practice privilege pursuant to Article 5.1 (commencing with Section 5096).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 586, Sec. 5.   (AB 3251)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5050.1.

(a) Any person that engages in any act that is the practice of public accountancy in this state consents to the personal, subject matter, and disciplinary jurisdiction of the board. This subdivision is declarative of existing law.

(b) Any person engaged in the practice of public accountancy under subdivision (a) is deemed to have appointed the regulatory authority of the state or foreign jurisdiction that issued the person’s permit, certificate, license or other authorization to practice as the person’s agent on whom notice, subpoenas, or other process may be served in any action or proceeding by or before the board against or involving that person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 458, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

5050.2.

(a) The board may revoke, suspend, issue a fine pursuant to Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 5116), or otherwise restrict or discipline the holder of an authorization to practice under subdivision (b) of Section 5050, subdivision (a) of Section 5054, or Section 5096.12 for any act that would be a violation of this code or grounds for discipline against a licensee or holder of a practice privilege, or grounds for denial of a license or practice privilege under this code. The provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, including, but not limited to, the commencement of a disciplinary proceeding by the filing of an accusation by the board shall apply to this section. Any person whose
 authorization to practice under subdivision (b) of Section 5050, subdivision (a) of Section 5054, or Section 5096.12 has been revoked may apply for reinstatement of the authorization to practice under subdivision (b) of Section 5050, subdivision (b) of Section 5054, or Section 5096.12 not less than one year after the effective date of the board’s decision revoking the authorization to practice unless a longer time, not to exceed three years, is specified in the board’s decision revoking the authorization to practice.

(b) The board may administratively suspend the authorization of any person to practice under subdivision (b) of Section 5050, subdivision (a) of Section 5054, or
 Section 5096.12 for any act that would be grounds for administrative suspension under Section 5096.4 utilizing the procedures set forth in that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 586, Sec. 6.   (AB 3251)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5051.

Except as provided in Sections 5052 and 5053, a person shall be deemed to be engaged in the practice of public accountancy within the meaning and intent of this chapter if they do any of the following:

(a) Hold themselves out to the public in any manner as one skilled in the knowledge, science, and practice of accounting, and as qualified and ready to render professional service as a public accountant for compensation.

(b) Maintain an office for the transaction of business as a public accountant.

(c) Offer to prospective clients to perform for compensation, or does perform on behalf of clients for compensation,
 professional services that involve or require an audit, examination, verification, investigation, certification, presentation, or review of financial transactions and accounting records.

(d) Prepare or certify for clients reports on audits or examinations of books or records of account, balance sheets, and other financial, accounting and related schedules, exhibits, statements, or reports that are to be used for publication, for the purpose of obtaining credit, for filing with a court of law or with any governmental agency, or for any other purpose.

(e) In general or as an incident to that work, render professional services to clients for compensation in any or all matters relating to accounting procedure and to the recording, presentation, or certification of financial information or data.

(f) Keep books, make trial
 balances, prepare statements, make audits, or prepare reports, all as a part of bookkeeping operations for clients.

(g) Prepare or sign, as the tax preparer, tax returns for clients.

(h) Prepare personal financial or investment plans or provide to clients products or services of others in implementation of personal financial or investment plans.

(i) Prepare management consulting services to clients.

The activities set forth in subdivisions (f) to (i), inclusive, are “public accountancy” only when performed by a certified public accountant or public accountant, as defined in this chapter.

A person is not engaged in the practice of public accountancy if the only services they engage in are those defined by subdivisions (f) to (i),
 inclusive, and they do not hold themselves out, solicit, or advertise for clients using the certified public accountant or public accountant designation. A person is not holding themselves out, soliciting, or advertising for clients within the meaning of this section solely by reason of displaying a CPA or PA certificate in their office or identifying themselves as a CPA or PA on other than signs, advertisements, letterhead, business cards, publications directed to clients or potential clients, or financial or tax documents of a client.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 67.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5052.

Nothing in this chapter shall apply to any person who as an employee, independent contractor, or otherwise, contracts with one or more persons, organizations, or entities, for the purpose of keeping books, making trial balances, statements, making audits or preparing reports, all as a part of bookkeeping operations, provided that such trial balances, statements, or reports are not issued over the name of such person as having been prepared or examined by a certified public accountant or public accountant.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall affect, limit or be construed as affecting or limiting the rights of any public accountant who met the requirements of prior statutes and who was registered with the board as a public accountant on or before December 31, 1955.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5062 by Stats. 1959, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

5053.

Nothing contained in this chapter precludes a person who is not a certified public accountant or public accountant from serving as an employee of, or an assistant to, a certified public accountant or public accountant or partnership or a corporation composed of certified public accountants or public accountants holding a permit to practice pursuant to this chapter if the employee or assistant works under the control and supervision of a certified public accountant, or a public accountant authorized to practice public accountancy pursuant to this chapter and if the employee or assistant does not issue any statement over their name.

This section does not apply to an attorney at law in connection with the practice of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 68.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5054.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an individual or firm holding a valid and current license, certificate, or permit to practice public accountancy from another state may prepare tax returns for natural persons who are California residents or estate tax returns for the estates of natural persons who were clients at the time of death without obtaining a permit to practice public accountancy issued by the board under this chapter or a practice privilege pursuant to Article 5.1 (commencing with Section 5096) provided that the individual or firm does not physically enter California to practice public accountancy pursuant to Section 5051, does not solicit California clients, and does not assert or imply that the individual or firm is licensed or registered to practice public accountancy in California.

(b) The board may, by regulation, limit the number of tax returns that may be prepared pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 658, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

5055.

Any person who has received from the board a certificate of certified public accountant, or who is authorized to practice public accountancy in this state pursuant to Article 5.1 (commencing with Section 5096), may, subject to Section 5051, be styled and known as a “certified public accountant” and may also use the abbreviation “C.P.A.” No other person, except a firm registered under this chapter, shall assume or use that title, designation, or abbreviation or any other title, designation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that the person using it is a certified public
 accountant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 430, Sec. 1.   (AB 181)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5056.

Any person who has received from the board a certificate of public accountant may, subject to Section 5051, be styled and known as a “public accountant” and may also use the abbreviation “P.A.” No other person, except a firm registered under this chapter, shall assume or use that title, designation, or abbreviation or any other title, designation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that the person using it is a public accountant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 878, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5057.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual holding a valid and current license, certificate, or permit to practice public accountancy from another state shall be exempt from the requirement to obtain a permit to practice public accountancy issued by the board under this chapter or to secure a practice privilege pursuant to Article 5.1 (commencing with Section 5096) if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The individual’s client is located in another state.

(b) The individual’s engagement with the client relates to work product to be delivered in another state.

(c) The individual does not solicit California clients, or have their
 principal place of business in this state.

(d) The individual does not assert or imply that they are licensed to practice public accountancy in California.

(e) The individual’s practice of public accountancy in this state on behalf of the client located in another state is of a limited duration, not extending beyond the period required to service the engagement for the client located in another state.

(f) The individual’s practice of public accountancy in this state specifically relates to servicing the engagement for the client located in another state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 69.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5058.

No person or partnership shall assume or use the title or designation “chartered accountant,” “certified accountant,” “enrolled accountant,” “registered accountant” or “licensed accountant,” or any other title or designation likely to be confused with “certified public accountant” or “public accountant,” or any of the abbreviations “C.A.,” “E.A.,” “R.A.,” or “L.A.,” or similar abbreviations likely to be confused with “C.P.A.” or “P.A.”; provided, that any person qualified as a certified public accountant under this chapter who also holds a comparable title granted under the laws of another country may use such title in conjunction with the title of “certified public accountant” or “C.P.A.” and provided, that any person enrolled to practice before the Internal Revenue Service and recognized as an enrolled agent may use the abbreviation “E.A.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

5058.1.

A person or firm may not use any title or designation in connection with the designation “certified public accountant” or “public accountant” that is false or misleading.

The board may adopt regulations covering the use of titles or designations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 878, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5058.2.

The holder of an inactive license issued by the board pursuant to Section 462, when lawfully using the title “certified public accountant,” the CPA designation, or any other reference that would suggest that the person is licensed by the board on materials such as correspondence, internet websites, business cards, nameplates, or name plaques, shall place the term “inactive” immediately after that designation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 70.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5058.3.

The holder of a retired license issued by the board pursuant to Section 5070.1, when lawfully using the title “certified public accountant,” the CPA designation, or any other reference that would suggest that the person is licensed by the board on materials such as correspondence, internet websites, business cards, nameplates, or name plaques, shall place the term “retired” immediately after that title, designation, or reference.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 71.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5058.4.

The holder of a permit in a military inactive status issued by the board pursuant to Section 5070.2, when lawfully using the title “certified public accountant,” the CPA designation, or any other reference that would suggest that the person is licensed by the board, on materials such as correspondence, internet websites, business cards, nameplates, or name plaques, shall place the term “military inactive” immediately after that title, designation, or reference.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 72.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Standards of Professional Conduct [5060. - 5063.10.]

5060.

(a) No person or firm may practice public accountancy under any name which is false or misleading.

(b) No person or firm may practice public accountancy under any name other than the name under which the person or firm holds a valid permit to practice issued by the board.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a sole proprietor may practice under a name other than the name set forth on their permit to practice, provided the name is registered by the board, is in good standing, and complies with the requirements of subdivision (a).

(d) The board may adopt regulations to implement, interpret, and make
 specific the provisions of this section including, but not limited to, regulations designating particular forms of names as being false or misleading.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 73.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5061.

(a) Except as expressly permitted by this section, a person engaged in the practice of public accountancy shall not: (1) pay a fee or commission to obtain a client or (2) accept a fee or commission for referring a client to the products or services of a third party.

(b) A person engaged in the practice of public accountancy who is not performing any of the services set forth in subdivision (c) and who complies with the disclosure requirements of subdivision (d) may accept a fee or commission for providing a client with the products or services of a third party where the products or services of a third party are provided in conjunction with professional services provided to the client by the person engaged in the practice of public accountancy. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to permit the solicitation or acceptance of any fee or commission solely for the referral of a client to a third party.

(c) A person engaged in the practice of public accountancy is prohibited from performing services for a client, or an officer or director of a client, or a client-sponsored retirement plan, for a commission or from receiving a commission from a third party for providing the products or services of that third party to a client, or an officer or director of a client, or a client-sponsored retirement plan, during the period in which the person also performs for that client, or officer or director of that client, or client-sponsored retirement plan, any of the services listed below and during the period covered by any historical financial statements involved in those listed services:

(1) An audit or review of a financial statement.
